Connecticut, session 2026, HB05270.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1,2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Children and Families;
(2) "Postsecondary education program" means any program that
leads to an academic degree or certification in a vocation or employment
training; and
(3) "Postsecondary education funding program" means the program
set forth in department policy 28-1 under which it funds the
postsecondary education of a youth who is committed to the
department, remains committed at the age of eighteen and meets the
requirements established by the department in its policies and
regulations.
(b) The Commissioner of Children and Families shall amend the
department policies and regulations regarding the postsecondary
education funding program to (1) increase the age until which a youth
can qualify for funding from the department under the postsecondary
education funding program from twenty-one to twenty-six years of age,
(2) increase the age until which a youth who is enrolled in a
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5270
postsecondary education program and continues to meet the
requirements established by the department is eligible for funding to
complete such postsecondary education program under the
postsecondary education funding program from twenty-three to
twenty-eight years of age, and (3) require any youth who is eligible for
funding under the postsecondary education funding program to
complete for each year such youth is enrolled in a postsecondary
education program, as a condition to receiving such funding, the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid and applications for any
appropriate scholarships and grants, including, but not limited to,
through any scholarship application portal administered by the
provider of such postsecondary education program. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require the department to continue
providing case management services for any youth who begins
receiving funding under the postsecondary education funding program
when such youth is older than twenty-one years of age.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1,2026 New section
KID Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 2 of 2